Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.460

Temporary cease and desist order—Injunction to set aside, limit, or suspend temporary order.

(1) Within ten days after a bank or holding company has been served with a temporary cease and desist order, the bank or holding company may apply to the superior court in the county of its principal place of business for an injunction setting aside, limiting, or suspending the order pending the completion of the administrative proceedings pursuant to the notice served under RCW 30A.04.455.

(2) The superior court shall have jurisdiction to issue the injunction.

[ 2014 c 37 s 138; 2010 c 88 s 17; 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 3. Formerly RCW 30.04.460.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 178: See note following RCW 30A.04.450.